Vermont statutes. Title 11 Corporations, Partnerships, and Associations
Subchapter 4. Governance

§ 840.
Directors and officers.

Not fewer than one-half of the directors of a professional corporation and all of its officers, except the secretary and treasurer (if any), must be qualified persons with respect to the corporation, except as provided in section 881 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

2001, No. 77

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

See note set out under chapter 4 of this title.

§ 841.
Voting of shares.

Only a qualified person may be appointed a proxy to vote shares of a professional corporation.

A voting trust with respect to shares of a professional corporation is not valid unless all of its trustees and beneficiaries are qualified persons. But, if a beneficiary who is a qualified person dies or becomes disqualified, a voting trust valid under this subsection continues to be valid for ten months after the date of death or for five months after the disqualification occurred.

HISTORY:

Added

2001, No. 77

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 842.
Confidential relationship.

The relationship between an individual rendering professional services as an employee of a domestic or foreign professional corporation and his or her client or patient is the same as if the individual were rendering the services as a sole practitioner.

The relationship between a domestic or foreign professional corporation and the client or patient for whom its employee is rendering professional services is the same as that between the client or patient and the employee.

HISTORY:

Added

2001, No. 77

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 843.
Privileged communications.

A privilege applicable to communications between an individual rendering professional services and the person receiving the services recognized under the statute or common law of the state is not affected by this chapter. The privilege applies to a domestic or foreign professional corporation and to its employees in all situations in which it applies to communications between an individual rendering professional services on behalf of the corporation and the person receiving the services.

HISTORY:

Added

2001, No. 77

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 844.
Responsibility for professional services.

An obligation of a professional corporation, whether arising in contract, tort, or otherwise, is solely the obligation of the professional corporation.

Except as otherwise provided by statute, if a domestic or foreign professional corporation is liable under subsection (a) of this section, every shareholder of the corporation is liable to the same extent as if he or she were a partner in a limited liability partnership pursuant to subsection 3226(c) of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

2001, No. 77

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.